Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1358
Crematory; building and location requirements.

(1) A crematory shall conform to all building codes and environmental regulations.

(2) A crematory may be constructed at any location consistent with applicable zoning and environmental regulations.

Laws 2003, LB 95, § 4.